Utah statutes.
4-31-7.   Claims for indemnity for destroyed or slaughtered cattle.
The owner of cattle, other than tubercular cattle, or other property which is
destroyed or slaughtered under authority of this chapter, shall present a
claim to the commissioner within 90 days from the date of the loss. The
commissioner shall present the claim to the Board of Examiners with a
recommendation as to the amount, if any, which should be allowed. A claim
under this section shall be considered and processed like any other claim
against the state.
